Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5506.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6b. (1) A county official shall not engage in lobbying for compensation outside of the course or scope of the county official's office. (2) A county official who violates subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (3) As used in this section: (a) "County official" means an individual who is elected as a county official or appointed to an elected position as a county official. (b) "Lobbying" means communicating directly with an official of a local government for the purpose of influencing an action of that local government.